Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.270

Responsibility for drug purity—Compounding—Adulteration—Penalty.

(1) Every proprietor of a wholesale or retail drug store shall be held responsible for the quality of all drugs, chemicals or medicines sold or dispensed by him or her except those sold in original packages of the manufacturer and except those articles or preparations known as patent or proprietary medicines.

(2) Any medicinal products that are compounded for patient administration or distribution to a licensed practitioner for patient use or administration shall, at a minimum, meet the standards of the official United States pharmacopeia as it applies to nonsterile products and sterile administered products.

(3) Any person who shall knowingly, willfully or fraudulently falsify or adulterate any drug or medicinal substance or preparation authorized or recognized by an official compendium or used or intended to be used in medical practice, or shall willfully, knowingly or fraudulently offer for sale, sell or cause the same to be sold for medicinal purposes, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine in any sum not less than seventy-five nor more than one hundred and fifty dollars or by imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not less than one month nor more than three months, and any person convicted a third time for violation of this section may suffer both fine and imprisonment. In any case he or she shall forfeit to the state of Washington all drugs or preparations so falsified or adulterated.

[ 2013 c 146 s 2; 2003 c 53 s 137; 1963 c 38 s 13; 1899 c 121 s 14; RRS s 10139. Prior: 1891 c 153 s 15. Formerly RCW 18.67.100 and 18.67.120.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2013 c 146: See note following RCW 18.64.011.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.